Nevada, session 83, SB360.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 447 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Board” means the State Board of Health.
Sec. 3. “Department” means the Department of Health and
Human Services.
Sec. 4. “Guest room” means a private room made available
by a hotel for occupancy by a guest. The term includes, without
limitation, a guest room comprised of several interconnected
rooms.
Sec. 5. “Hotel employee” means any natural person in the
service of a hotel operator who provides such service under any
appointment or contract of hire or apprenticeship, express or
implied, oral or written, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed.
Sec. 6. “Hotel operator” means any owner or keeper of a
hotel. The term includes, without limitation, any person or
contractor who, in a managerial, supervisory or confidential
capacity, employs one or more hotel employees.
Sec. 7. “Occupied guest room” means a guest room for
which a guest is currently checked in, regardless of whether the
guest is physically present in the room.
Sec. 8. “Resort hotel” means:
1. A resort hotel, as defined in NRS 463.01865;
-
*SB360*

– 3 –
2. An establishment described in section 19 of chapter 452,
Statutes of Nevada 1997, at page 1713; or
3. A resort hotel described in section 20 of chapter 452,
Statutes of Nevada 1997, at page 1713.
Sec. 9. “Room attendant” means a hotel employee whose
principal duties are to clean and maintain guest rooms in a hotel.
Sec. 10. “Room cleaning” means the performance of
services or tasks that are necessary to maintain the cleanliness of
a guest room before, during or after a guest occupies the guest
room. The term does not include:
1. Organizing or maintaining inventory in a guest room;
2. Delivering inventory to a guest room;
3. Turndown service or other tasks associated with preparing
a bed that was already made; or
4. Conducting preventative or necessary maintenance to a
guest room, including, without limitation, repairs, replacement
and general maintenance of appliances, electronics, furniture,
doors, windows, carpets, walls, plumbing and other fixtures.
Sec. 11. The provisions of sections 11 to 16, inclusive, of this
act apply to a county whose population is 100,000 or more.
Sec. 12. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations requiring,
except as provided in subsection 2, a hotel operator to ensure that
each occupied guest room at the hotel receives daily room
cleaning if the hotel is:
(a) A resort hotel; or
(b) A hotel that contains more than 200 guest rooms or
designated suites of guest rooms.
2. The Board shall not require a hotel operator to ensure that
an occupied guest room receives daily room cleaning in
accordance with subsection 1 if:
(a) The hotel operator is unable to provide room cleaning due
to:
(1) The occurrence of an emergency; or
(2) A superseding government restriction prohibiting the
performance of the room cleaning; or
(b) The guest occupying the room:
(1) Conspicuously displays a “do not disturb” or “privacy”
marker on the door of the entrance to the guest room; or
(2) Opts out of daily room cleaning orally or in writing for
all or part of the duration of the guest’s stay in the guest room.
3. If a guest opts out of daily room cleaning in accordance
with paragraph (b) of subsection 2, the Board shall require the
hotel operator to maintain written documentation of the guest’s
choice to opt out for a period of not less than 3 years.
-
*SB360*

– 4 –
4. The Board shall adopt regulations prohibiting a hotel from
advising or incentivizing guests to decline daily room cleaning.
5. For the purposes of this section, “emergency” means an
occurrence or threatened occurrence for which action is necessary
to save lives, protect property or to protect the health and safety of
persons, or to avert the threat of damage to property or injury to
persons.
Sec. 13. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations requiring a
hotel operator to ensure that the interior of each occupied guest
room at the hotel is visually inspected by a room attendant not less
than every second consecutive day during a guest’s occupancy to
ensure the safety of the guest and the public if the hotel is a:
(a) Resort hotel; or
(b) Hotel that contains more than 200 guest rooms or
designated suites of guest rooms.
2. A room attendant performing a visual inspection of an
occupied guest room in accordance with subsection 1 may:
(a) Request the physical presence of either security personnel
or a manager for the hotel for the duration of an inspection of an
occupied guest room; and
(b) Decline to perform an inspection of an occupied guest
room until security personnel or a manager for the hotel is
present.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations prohibiting a room
attendant who performs a visual inspection of an occupied guest
room in accordance with subsection 1 from physically inspecting
or moving any property which belongs to the guest in the occupied
guest room.
Sec. 14. 1. The health authority may, upon receiving a
complaint, inspect a hotel to ensure compliance with the
provisions of the regulations adopted pursuant to sections 12 and
13 of this act.
2. Upon discovering a violation of the regulations adopted
pursuant to sections 12 and 13 of this act, and after notice and the
opportunity for a hearing, the health authority:
(a) Shall order the hotel operator to correct the violation.
(b) May impose an administrative fine of not more than $500
for each initial violation or $1,000 for each second or subsequent
violation.
(c) If the violation occurs at a hotel that is not a resort hotel,
may notify any local governmental entity responsible for licensing
or regulating the hotel. Upon receiving such notification, the local
governmental entity shall review the violation and may take
further action, including, without limitation, suspending or
revoking the license of the hotel, to enforce the regulations
-
*SB360*

– 5 –
adopted pursuant to sections 12 and 13 of this act. Such action
must be taken in accordance with any procedures established by
the local governmental entity for actions to enforce statutes or
regulations or impose disciplinary action generally.
(d) If the violation occurs at a resort hotel subject to the
jurisdiction of the Nevada Gaming Control Board, shall notify the
Nevada Gaming Control Board. Upon receiving such notification,
the Nevada Gaming Control Board may take further action to
enforce the regulations adopted pursuant to sections 12 and 13 of
this act. Such action must be taken in accordance with any
procedures established by the Nevada Gaming Control Board for
actions to enforce statutes or regulations or impose disciplinary
action generally.
Sec. 15. The Director of the Department shall adopt
regulations prohibiting a hotel operator from discharging,
reducing the compensation of, increasing the workload of,
imposing fees or charges on, changing the duties of or otherwise
taking adverse action against a hotel employee in retaliation for:
1. Participating in proceedings related to sections 11 to 16,
inclusive, of this act;
2. Disclosing or threatening to disclose to a supervisor or a
governmental entity an activity, policy or practice of a hotel
operator that the hotel employee reasonably believes to violate
sections 11 to 16, inclusive, of this act or otherwise poses a
substantial and specific danger to public health or safety;
3. Refusing to participate in any activity, policy or practice
described in subsection 2; or
4. Seeking enforcement of sections 11 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 16. 1. A person aggrieved by a violation of the
regulations adopted pursuant to section 12, 13 or 14 of this act
may institute a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction.
2. A person instituting a civil action in accordance with this
section must:
(a) Notify the Department of the civil action; and
(b) Send the Department a copy of the complaint.
 Failure to notify the Department of the civil action or send the
Department a copy of the complaint does not adversely affect such
a cause of action.
Sec. 17. NRS 447.003 is hereby amended to read as follows:
447.003 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 447.007 and 447.010 ,
and sections 2 to 10, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB360*

– 6 –
Sec. 18. 1. This section and sections 1 to 10, inclusive, and
17 of this act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 11 to 16, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB360*